Georgia, session 2025_26, HB570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to local government, is amended
in Chapter 80, relating to general provisions applicable to counties, municipal corporations,
and other governmental entities, by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"36-80-32.
(a) The World Health Organization and United Nations shall have no jurisdiction or power
within this state.
(b) No rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of any kind of the World Health
Organization or United Nations shall be enforced or implemented by any local board of
H. B. 570
- 1 -

LC 52 0779
education, local authority, county, municipality, consolidated government, or any political
subdivision of this state."
SECTION 2.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
in Chapter 1, relating to general provisions, by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-1-14.
(a) The World Health Organization and United Nations shall have no jurisdiction or power
within this state.
(b) No rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of any kind of the World Health
Organization or United Nations shall be enforced or implemented by this state or any
department, agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of this state."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 570
- 2 -